Wisconsin, session 2025, AB721.
do enact as follows:AB721,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (dp) of the statutes is created to read:AB721,2,3220.835 (2) (dp) Beginning farmer and farm asset owner tax credit. A sum 3sufficient to pay the claims approved under ss. 71.07 (8s), 71.28 (8s), and 71.47 (8s).AB721,24Section 2. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 515, is amended to read:AB721,2,11671.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 7(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5f), (5h), 8(5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and not passed through by a 9partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 10that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 11under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB721,312Section 3. 71.07 (8s) of the statutes is created to read:AB721,2,141371.07 (8s) Beginning farmer and farm asset owner tax credit. (a) 14Definitions. In this subsection:AB721,3,211. “Agricultural assets” means agricultural land or machinery, equipment, 2facilities, or livestock that is used in farming.AB721,3,332. “Agricultural land” has the meaning given in s. 70.32 (2) (c) 1g.AB721,3,543. “Asset owner” means a person who meets the conditions specified in s. 593.521 (3).AB721,3,764. “Beginning farmer” means a person who meets the conditions specified in s. 793.521 (2).AB721,3,1085. “Claimant” means a beginning farmer who files a claim under this 9subsection or an asset owner who files a claim under this subsection, except that, 10for a beginning farmer, “claimant” means the following:AB721,3,1211a. For partnerships, except publicly traded partnerships treated as 12corporations under s. 71.22 (1k), “claimant” means each separate partner.AB721,3,1313b. For tax-option corporations, “claimant” means each separate shareholder.AB721,3,1514c. For limited liability companies, except limited liability companies treated 15as corporations under s. 71.22 (1k), “claimant” means each separate member.AB721,3,17166. “Farming” has the meaning given in section 464 (e) of the Internal Revenue 17Code.AB721,3,21187. “Lease amount” is the amount of the cash payment paid by a beginning 19farmer to an asset owner each year for leasing the asset owner’s agricultural assets, 20including amounts paid under a lease agreement that results in the beginning 21farmer owning the agricultural assets.AB721,4,622(b) Filing claims. 1. Subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, for 23taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, a beginning farmer may claim as 1a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal to 5 percent of the 2lease amount or sales price paid by the beginning farmer to an asset owner for the 3lease or purchase of agricultural assets for the taxable year to which the claim 4relates. The beginning farmer may also claim an amount equal to 5 percent of the 5amount the beginning farmer paid in the taxable year for improvements to 6agricultural assets consisting of land and facilities.AB721,4,1172. Subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, for taxable years 8beginning after December 31, 2026, an asset owner may claim as a credit against 9the tax imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal to 5 percent of the lease amount or 10sales price received by the asset owner from a beginning farmer for agricultural 11assets for the taxable year to which the claim relates.AB721,4,1412(c) Limitations. 1. With regard to credit claimed on the basis of a lease 13amount, a claimant may only claim the credit under this subsection for the first 3 14years of any lease of an asset owner’s agricultural assets to a beginning farmer.AB721,4,16152. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 16the time period under s. 71.75 (2).AB721,4,18173. A claimant shall submit with the claimant’s income tax return the 18certificate of eligibility provided under s. 93.521 (5) (b).AB721,4,20194. No credit may be claimed under this subsection by a part-year resident or a 20nonresident of this state.AB721,4,22215. The maximum credit that a claimant may claim under this subsection for 22any taxable year is $75,000.AB721,5,5236. a. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations 1may not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and the 2amount of, the credit are based on the amounts paid under par. (b). A partnership, 3limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 4credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 5provide that information to each of them.AB721,5,96b. In order to claim the credit computed under par. (b) 1., partners, members 7of limited liability companies, and shareholders of tax-option corporations shall 8meet the requirements under s. 93.521 (2) and claim the credit in proportion to 9their ownership interests.AB721,5,1210(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (e), (g), and (h), to the extent that it 11applies to the credit under that subsection, applies to the credit under this 12subsection.AB721,5,17132. If the allowable amount of the claim under this subsection exceeds the 14income taxes otherwise due on the claimant’s income, the amount of the claim not 15used as an offset against those taxes shall be certified by the department of revenue 16to the department of administration for payment to the claimant by check, share 17draft, or other draft from the appropriation under s. 20.835 (2) (dp).AB721,418Section 4. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 19is amended to read:AB721,6,52071.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 21preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 22beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 2371.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 2471.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 1and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs 2credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing 3zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), beginning farmer and farm asset owner tax credit 4under s. 71.07 (8s), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), estimated tax 5payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.AB721,56Section 5. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 7is amended to read:AB721,6,11871.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 971.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 10(5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and passed through to 11partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.AB721,612Section 6. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1315, is amended to read:AB721,6,191471.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 15(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), 16(5r), (5rm), (6n), (8s), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 17liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 18partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 19s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB721,720Section 7. 71.28 (8s) of the statutes is created to read:AB721,6,222171.28 (8s) Beginning farmer and farm asset owner tax credit. (a) 22Definitions. In this subsection:AB721,6,24231. “Agricultural assets” means agricultural land or machinery, equipment, 24facilities, or livestock that is used in farming.AB721,7,112. “Agricultural land” has the meaning given in s. 70.32 (2) (c) 1g.AB721,7,323. “Asset owner” means a person who meets the conditions specified in s. 393.521 (3).AB721,7,544. “Beginning farmer” means a person who meets the conditions specified in s. 593.521 (2).AB721,7,865. “Claimant” means a beginning farmer who files a claim under this 7subsection or an asset owner who files a claim under this subsection, except that, 8for a beginning farmer, “claimant” means the following:AB721,7,109a. For partnerships, except publicly traded partnerships treated as 10corporations under s. 71.22 (1k), “claimant” means each separate partner.AB721,7,1111b. For tax-option corporations, “claimant” means each separate shareholder.AB721,7,1312c. For limited liability companies, except limited liability companies treated 13as corporations under s. 71.22 (1k), “claimant” means each separate member.AB721,7,15146. “Farming” has the meaning given in section 464 (e) of the Internal Revenue 15Code. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab721 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab721 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB721 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB721 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB721: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting